Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 4

Collection of Assessments

54-12-401. Collection of assessments by county trustee — Kept as a separate fund — Collection by bill in chancery — Personalty not to be distrained for such assessment.

Assessments provided for by this chapter shall be collected by the county trustee as county taxes are collected, except as provided otherwise in this part, and the funds collected shall be kept as a separate fund, and shall be paid out only for purposes properly connected with the improvement on the order or warrant of the county mayor; but the assessments may be collected by bill filed in chancery, as provided in §§ 54-12-412 — 54-12-421, and no personal property of the owner of land assessed shall be liable or distrained upon for the assessment, but only the land assessed shall be liable for the assessment.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 83; Shan. Supp., § 1682a97; Code 1932, § 2911; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1601; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Drainage and levee districts, title 69, ch. 5.

Collateral References. Highways
121 et seq.

54-12-402. Amount fixed for annual levy — County bonds issued — Cost exceeding estimate, new apportionment of assessment and levy and other bonds.

If the county legislative body determines that the estimated cost of drainage of the district or road improvement district is greater than should be levied in a single year upon the lands benefited, the county legislative body may fix the amount that should be levied and collected each year, and may issue road improvement bonds of the county pursuant to title 9, chapter 21, and may devote the bonds at par, with accrued interest, to the payment of the expenses and work as it progresses or may sell the bonds at not less than par, with accrued interest, and devote the proceeds to the payment. If in the sale of the bonds a premium is received, the premium shall be credited to the improvement fund.

Should the cost of the work exceed the estimate, a new apportionment of the assessment may be made and levied and other bonds issued and sold in like manner, but in no case shall the bonds run longer than twenty (20) years.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 84; Shan. Supp., § 1682a98; Code 1932, § 2912; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1602; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 19; 1988, ch. 750, § 61.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, § 47-14-103.

Collateral References.

Improvement districts in financial distress, validity of statute authorizing county to issue bonds to relieve property in, subject to assessment for improvements, from all or part of such assessment. 105 A.L.R. 1169.

54-12-403. Payment in full amount of benefit assessed against land before bonds are issued.

Any property owner may pay the full amount of the benefit assessed against the owner's property before the bonds are issued and receive a receipt in full for the payment.

The payment shall be made to the county trustee, and it shall be the duty of the county clerk to certify to the trustee the amount of the assessment when requested to do so.

The trustee shall enter the payment upon the assessment lists in the trustee's hands in a separate place provided for the payments, and furnish the county clerk with duplicate receipts given for all assessments paid in full, one (1) of which the clerk shall deliver to the county mayor, and the trustee shall also give a receipt to the property owner so paying in full.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 85; Shan. Supp., § 1682a99; Code 1932, § 2913; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1603; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

54-12-404. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-12-404 (Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 86; Code 1932, § 2914; Shan. Supp., § 1682a100; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1604), concerning terms, times of payment, and signing and sealing of bonds, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 62.

54-12-405. Bonds to be paid only by assessments levied on the lands within the district.

Each bond shall show expressly on its face that it is to be paid only by assessments levied and collected on the lands within the district so designated and numbered, and for the benefit of which district the bond is issued. No assessment shall be levied or collected for the payment of the bond or bonds, or the interest on the bonds, on any property, real or personal, outside the district so numbered, designated, and benefited.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 87; Shan. Supp., § 1682a101; Code 1932, § 2915; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1605.

Collateral References.

Reference to fund from which they are to be paid, negotiability of municipal bonds as affected by. 42 A.L.R. 1027.

54-12-406 — 54-12-409. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-12-406 — 54-12-409 (Acts 1919, ch. 193, §§ 88-91; Code 1932, §§ 2916-2919; Shan. Supp., §§ 1682a102-1682a105; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 20; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 54-1606 — 54-1609), concerning bonds and warrants issued instead of bonds, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 63.

54-12-410. Assessment book made by county clerk for entire assessment or annually — Interest on assessments after delinquency.

The assessments provided for by this chapter, and to be collected for the purpose provided in this chapter, shall be entered upon a book to be provided by the county clerk, at the expense of the county, for this purpose, in a similar manner to that in which taxes are entered upon the tax books, the books showing the tract of land, amounts of assessments, etc., and the book, when made out, shall be furnished to the county trustee for collection of assessments so levied.

This book shall be called the road improvement assessment book, and shall be made out by the county clerk of the county in which the particular assessment is levied.

The book may be made out but once, if practicable, for the entire assessment for the particular improvement project; but if not practicable, then a new assessment book may be made out for a shorter period, or for each year, and furnished to the county trustee.

The assessment levied under this chapter shall become due and payable and delinquent, and the assessments shall bear interest at the legal rate after they become delinquent.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 92; Shan. Supp., § 1682a106; Code 1932, § 2920; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1610; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

54-12-411. Assessments become liens upon land.

The assessments provided for by this chapter, when made and levied, shall be and become valid liens upon lands.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 93; Shan. Supp., § 1682a106½; Code 1932, § 2921; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1611.

Collateral References.

Installment plan of payment as affecting duration of lien of special assessment. 114 A.L.R. 399.

54-12-412. Bill in chancery to sell land for collection of delinquent assessments.

When assessments have been due and delinquent for sixty (60) days, bills may be filed in the chancery court of the county, or chancery district in which the lands lie, upon which the assessments are due and delinquent, for the collection of the assessments, out of the lands by a sale of the lands in all cases.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 94; Shan. Supp., § 1682a107; Code 1932, § 2922; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1612.

Collateral References.

Personal liability of property owner for deficiency above value of property assessed. 127 A.L.R. 590, 167 A.L.R. 1030.

Public property, sale of, to enforce payment of assessment against. 95 A.L.R. 690, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

54-12-413. Bill filed in name of county against landowners — All delinquents may be made defendants to same bill.

The bills in chancery shall be filed in the name of the county in which the lands are situated for the use of the improvement district for the benefit of which the assessments were made, and against the owners, if known, and if unknown, against them to the bill.

The owners of all the lands upon which assessments are delinquent may be made defendants to the same bill as parties to the bill.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 95; Shan. Supp., § 1682a109; Code 1932, § 2924; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1613.

54-12-414. Trustee to furnish certified list of delinquent lands and names of owners, which is prima facie proof authorizing a decree.

When it is desired by the board of directors or other interested party entitled to sue, to file the bill, the county trustee, upon request, shall make out a statement or list, showing all the lands upon which assessments are delinquent and the names of the owners of the lands, as appear upon the road assessment book or showing any tract or tracts assessed to unknown owners, if such be the case, and certify as trustee to the correctness of the statement or list as the statement or list appears upon the book.

In the chancery suit, the certified statement or list shall be prima facie proof of the facts certified, and that the assessments are delinquent and sufficient proof to authorize a decree of sale in the absence of rebutting proof of the facts shown by the certificate.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 96; Shan. Supp., § 1682a110; Code 1932, § 2925; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1614.

Collateral References.

Certificate or statement of treasurer or other public official regarding unpaid assessments against specific property, effect of. 107 A.L.R. 568, 21 A.L.R.2d 1273.

54-12-415. Suits proceeded with as other suits in chancery, except separate hearing and decree as to any one defendant.

The suits in chancery shall be proceeded with as other suits are in that court, except that the court may hear the case as to any one (1) or more of the defendants, whether ready to be heard as to other defendants or not, and proceed to sale and final decree as to any one (1) or more of the defendants, though the case is not disposed of as to other defendants.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 97; Shan. Supp., § 1682a111; Code 1932, § 2926; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1615.

54-12-416. Public taxes to be paid before the delinquent assessments.

When a sale is ordered in the suit, and is made and reported, the clerk and master of the court, so making the sale, shall report what public taxes are a lien upon any tract so sold in favor of the state, county, or any municipality, and the court shall see that this is done, and any taxes, if the sale is confirmed, shall be first paid out of the proceeds of the sale before the delinquent assessments are paid.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 98; Shan. Supp., § 1682a112; Code 1932, § 2927; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1616.

54-12-417. Divestiture and vestiture of title subject to other unpaid assessments — Writ of possession.

Upon confirmation of the sale by the chancery court, it shall divest title out of the owner and vest it in the purchaser and award a writ of possession, if asked for; but where title is so vested in a purchaser, the land so purchased shall still be subject in the hands of the purchaser, the purchaser's heirs, or assigns, to any other assessments not yet due, and are unpaid, that may have been made and fixed or levied upon it at the time of the confirmation of sale, for the benefit of the improvement district on account of which the sales have been made.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 99; Shan. Supp., § 1682a113; Code 1932, § 2928; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1617.

54-12-418. Sale for cash subject to redemption within two years — Manner of redemption.

When the sale is made by decree of the chancery court, it shall be made for cash, and the owners of land sold shall have two (2) years from the date of the confirmation of the sale in which to redeem the land, by paying to the clerk and master of the court making the sale, the amount paid by the purchaser for the land, with legal interest on the amount to the date of redemption, and also a further sum equal to ten percent (10%) of the amount paid by the purchaser for the land.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 100; Shan. Supp., § 1682a114; Code 1932, § 2929; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1618.

54-12-419. Attorney's fee charged as part of judgment.

In the proceedings in chancery court, the attorneys or solicitors employed and attending to the suit shall be allowed as a fee ten percent (10%) of the amount found due as an assessment on each tract of land decreed to be sold, the fee to be charged up in the decree as part of the judgment for which the land is to be sold.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 101; Shan. Supp., § 1682a115; Code 1932, § 2930; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1619.

54-12-420. Adjudication of redemption — Declaring land that of owner so redeeming — Writ of possession.

When the lands are redeemed as provided in §§ 54-12-418, 54-12-419, this section and § 54-12-421, and this fact is made satisfactorily to appear to the chancery court, the court shall enter a decree in the cause, adjudging the land redeemed and declaring it to be the property of the owner redeeming the property, or of the owner's heirs or assigns, if redeemed by the owner's heirs or assigns, and if necessary may award a writ of possession to put the person redeeming in possession of the land.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 102; Shan. Supp., § 1682a116; Code 1932, § 2931; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1620.

54-12-421. Redemption of lands by minors and persons adjudicated incompetent
within a year of restoration of competency.

Minors and persons who are adjudicated incompetent shall have the further period of one (1) year after the restoration of competency in which to redeem their lands sold under this chapter under like terms as to amounts to be paid, in redemption, as provided in § 54-12-418.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 103; Shan. Supp., § 1682a117; Code 1932, § 2932; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1621; Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 55.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment substituted “adjudicated incompetent shall have the further period of one (1) year after the restoration of competency” for “of unsound mind shall have the further period of one (1) year after the removal of the disabilities”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 110. July 1, 2011.

Cited: McGee v. Carter, 31 Tenn. App. 141, 212 S.W.2d 902, 1948 Tenn. App. LEXIS 78 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1948).

54-12-422. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-12-422 (Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 104; Code 1932, § 2933; Shan. Supp., § 1682a118; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1622), concerning borrowing money to pay bonds and interest authorized, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 63.

54-12-423. Assessments collectible only out of the assessed land.

The assessments provided for by this chapter, if not paid by the owners of the land assessed, shall be collected only out of the land assessed for improvement purposes, and shall not be collected by distress warrant or otherwise out of any other property, real or personal, of the owners of the land assessed under this chapter.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 105; Shan. Supp., § 1682a119; Code 1932, § 2934; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1623.

54-12-424. Compensation of trustee for collecting and paying out, and for certified copies.

For collecting and paying out the assessments under this chapter, the county trustee shall receive as compensation two percent (2%) on all amounts paid out by the trustee; and for any certified statements furnished by the trustee, the same fees per one hundred (100) words as are allowed clerks of courts for certified copies of records.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 108; Shan. Supp., § 1682a122; Code 1932, § 2937; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1624.

54-12-425. Compensation of trustee for receiving and paying out money derived from sale of bonds and warrants — Bond and compensation of successor.

The county trustee, for receiving and paying out money received from the sale of bonds and warrants issued and sold under this part, shall be entitled to a commission of one-half of one percent (0.5%) for receiving the money, and one-half of one percent (0.5%) for paying out the money.

Any moneys and funds remaining with the county trustee at the expiration of the county trustee's term of office shall be paid over to the county trustee's successor when the successor has executed bond for the moneys and funds as provided in this part.

It is the duty of the succeeding trustee to execute the bond, and failure to do so shall result in liability for the penalties provided for the failure.

The trustee actually disbursing the funds arising from the sale of bonds or warrants shall be entitled to the commission of one-half of one percent (0.5%); provided, the successor shall not be entitled to any commissions for receiving the funds from the trustee's predecessor.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 109; Shan. Supp., § 1682a123; Code 1932, § 2938; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1625.

54-12-426. Surplus funds from assessments, bonds, or notes — Disposition.

When, in the making of any improvement for a road improvement district provided for in this chapter, bonds or notes of the districts have heretofore been made or hereafter sold for the purpose of providing funds for the improvement, and money is left over of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds or notes after the improvement has been paid for, for which the bonds or notes were issued and sold, the board of directors of the improvement district, with the approval of the entity exercising the former jurisdiction of the monthly county court having jurisdiction of the cause in which the district was created shall have the power to disburse the surplus funds for further improving the roads in the district as may be deemed best, or the surplus funds and money may be used by paying all or in part any assessment made on the lands of the district and not yet collected, in which event the particular assessment, or part of the assessment, need not be collected; or the surplus of funds may be used in purchasing and retiring any of the bonds or notes issued; provided, that they can be bought at not above par with any accrued interest on the bonds or notes.

The board of directors, with the approval of the court, has the right and power to dispose of surplus funds in any of the methods set out in subsection (a) that the board and the court may deem best for the district, the court to concur, by its order or decree, in the disposition.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 94; Shan. Supp., § 1682a108; Code 1932, § 2923; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1626; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 64.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.